North Dakota, session 69, HB1178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
School districts - Policy - Voting.
Each school district shall adopt a policy allowing a student who is a qualified elector to leave
campus to vote in a general, special, or primary election. The policy may include conditions for the
student's absence, including a limitation on the length of time the student may be absent or a
designated time to vote.

H. B. NO. 1178 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1178.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 1 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 24 Nays 23 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State